Maryland, session 2026, SB0899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–149.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–701 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “FIREARM HOLD AGREEMENT” MEANS A PRIVATE AGREEMENT
BETWEEN A FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER AND A PERSON WHO OWNS A
FIREARM IN WHICH THE FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0899*

SENATE BILL 899
(I) TAKES PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THE FIREARM OWNER’S
LAWFULLY POSSESSED FIREARM OR FIREARMS AT THE FIREARM OWNER’S
REQUEST;
(II) HOLDS THE FIREARM OR FIREARMS FOR AN AGREED
PERIOD OF TIME; AND
(III) RETURNS THE FIREARM OR FIREARMS TO THE FIREARM
OWNER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO FIREARM TRANSFERS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–234 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER MAY NOT BE HELD CIVILLY LIABLE FOR
PERSONAL INJURY TO OR DEATH OF ANY PERSON AFTER THE RETURN OF A FIREARM
TO A FIREARM OWNER BY THE FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER AT THE
TERMINATION OF A FIREARM HOLD AGREEMENT.
(2) THE IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH CAUSED
BY UNLAWFUL CONDUCT ON THE PART OF THE FEDERALLY LICENSED FIREARMS
DEALER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.